Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB1.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) Commencing after 2 o'clock antemeridian on the first
Sunday of November of 2025 following the effective date of this act, the
state of Kansas shall not observe daylight saving time and shall be exempt
from the daylight saving time provisions of 15 U.S.C. § 260a(a).
(b) This section shall not affect the standard time established by
United States law governing the movements of common carriers engaged
in interstate commerce.
(c) This section shall not affect the following times as may be
established by a statute, order, rule or regulation of the United States or an
agency thereof:
(1) The time for performance of an act by an officer or department of
the United States;
(2) the time within which any rights shall accrue or determine; or
(3) the time within which any act shall or shall not be performed by
any person subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.
(d) This section shall have no force and effect from and after the date
of publication in the Kansas register of the notice prescribed in section 2 3,
and amendments thereto.
Sec. 2. The secretary of state shall monitor the enactment of any
law by the state of Missouri that provides that such state shall be exempt
from the daylight saving time provisions of 15 U.S.C. § 260a(a). If such
law is enacted, the secretary shall cause a notice of such enactment to be
published in the Kansas register at the time of the next regular
publication of the Kansas register following the date such law becomes
effective.
Sec. 2. 3. (a) The secretary of state shall monitor the enactment of any
federal law that requires the year-round observation of central daylight
saving time. If such law is enacted, the secretary shall cause a notice of
such enactment to be published in the Kansas register at the time of the
next regular publication of the Kansas register following the date such law
becomes effective.

SB 1—Am. by SC 2
(b) As used in this section, "central daylight saving time" means the
standard time of the third zone, as established in 15 U.S.C. § 261,
advanced one hour.
Sec. 3. 4. (a) Commencing after 2 o'clock antemeridian on the first
Sunday of November after the effective date of this section, all areas of the
state of Kansas shall observe central daylight saving time.
(b) This section shall not affect the standard time established by
United States law governing the movements of common carriers engaged
in interstate commerce.
(c) This section shall not affect the following times as may be
established by a statute, order, rule or regulation of the United States or an
agency thereof:
(1) The time for performance of an act by an officer or department of
the United States;
(2) the time within which any rights shall accrue or determine; or
(3) the time within which any act shall or shall not be performed by
any person subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.
(d) As used in this section, "central daylight saving time" means the
standard time of the third zone, as established in 15 U.S.C. § 261,
advanced one hour.
Sec. 5. Section 1 shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book and the date of publication in the Kansas
register of the notice prescribed in section 2.
Sec. 4. 6. Section 3 4 shall take effect and be in force from and after
its publication in the statute book and the date of publication in the Kansas
register of the notice prescribed in section 2 3.
Sec. 5. 7. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.